Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1130.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 5722 of Title 3 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a definition to read:§ 5722. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this subchapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Generally recognized as safe substance" or "GRAS substance." A substance that is added to food, is not a food additive and is generally recognized, among experts qualified by scientific training and experience to evaluate its safety, as having been 1234567891011121314151617 adequately shown to be safe under the conditions of its intended use through:(1) scientific procedures using the same quantity and quality of scientific evidence as is required to obtain approval of the substance as a food additive; or(2) if the substance was used in food prior to January 1, 1958, experience based on common use in food.* * *Section 2. Title 3 is amended by adding sections to read:§ 5725.1. Reporting of GRAS substances.(a) Prohibited conduct.--(1) Unless a report has been filed with the secretary as required under subsection (b) for the GRAS substance and the GRAS substance is listed on the database established under section 5725.2 (relating to public database of GRAS reports), it is unlawful for a person to:(i) sell or offer or expose for sale for use in or on food, or to use in the manufacturing, compounding, brewing, distilling, producing or processing of any food or food product containing a GRAS substance or combination of GRAS substances;(ii) make a new use of a GRAS substance or combination of GRAS substances in or on food; or(iii) sell or offer or expose for sale food or food product containing a GRAS substance or combination of GRAS substances.(2) For purposes of paragraph (1), a person does not include a small business as defined in 62 Pa.C.S. § 2102 (relating to definitions).(b) Report.--A person may file a report with the secretary 20250HB1130PN1415 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 that includes the following information relating to a GRAS substance:(1) All the data and information required for submission of a GRAS notice under 21 CFR 170.220 (relating to general requirements applicable to a GRAS notice), 170.225 (relating to part 1 of a GRAS notice: signed statements and certification), 170.230 (relating to part 2 of a GRAS notice: identity, method of manufacture, specifications, and physical or technical effect), 170.235 (relating to part 3 of a GRAS notice: dietary exposure), 170.240 (relating to part 4 of a GRAS notice: self-limiting levels of use), 170.245 (relating to part 5 of a GRAS notice: experience based on common use in food before 1958), 170.250 (relating to part 6 of a GRAS notice: narrative) and 170.255 (relating to part 7 of a GRAS notice: list of supporting data and information in your GRAS notice) , as those provisions exist on the effective date of this section. Data establishing the general recognition of safety must be based on publicly available information and not on trade secrets.(2) A statement as to whether any of the data and information in the report is a record not subject to inspection and duplication under the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law.(c) Applicability.--This section does not apply to the following substances:(1) A GRAS substance for which the Food and Drug Administration has received a GRAS notice and issued a letter stating that the Food and Drug Administration has no questions regarding the conclusion that the substance is generally recognized as safe under its intended conditions of 20250HB1130PN1415 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 use.(2) A substance recognized in Federal regulations as prior sanctioned or a GRAS substance for use in food or food packaging.(3) A food contact substance for which there is an effective premarket notification demonstrating safety for its intended use.(4) A substance subject to a regulation that approves its intended use for food.(5) A food ingredient of natural biological origin that has been widely consumed for its nutrient properties in the United States prior to January 1, 1958, without known detrimental effects, that is subject only to conventional processing as practiced prior to January 1, 1958, and for which no known safety hazard exists.(6) A substance for which the Food and Drug Administration has received a new dietary ingredient notification and issued a letter of acknowledgment without objection that the substance is safe under the intended conditions of use stated in the letter.(7) A substance determined safe to be added to foods by the secretary through rulemaking.§ 5725.2. Public database of GRAS reports.(a) Duties of secretary.--The secretary shall:(1) Make reports submitted in accordance with section 5725.1 (relating to reporting of GRAS substances) available to the public from a database on the department's publicly accessible Internet website. The database shall:(i) be searchable by members of the public;(ii) enable consumers to download and print 20250HB1130PN1415 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 displayed information; and(iii) accommodate reasonably anticipated and actual public use.(2) Redact from the public report information that has been designated by the person that submitted the information as a trade secret or that is not subject to inspection and duplication under the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law, provided, however, that data establishing the general recognition of safety is not required to be redacted.(3) Update the database with any new information that the secretary receives relating to the safety of a GRAS substance.(b) Refusal to list.--The secretary may refuse to list a GRAS substance in the database if the secretary determines the information reported on the GRAS substance does not contain the information required by section 5725.1.(c) Fees.--The secretary may establish and charge a fee to a person that files a report of a GRAS substance in order to recover the costs incurred in listing the GRAS substance and maintaining the database.(d) Report to General Assembly.--The secretary shall provide an interim progress report to the General Assembly concerning efforts to develop and implement the database. The report shall include:(1) A projected completion date.(2) A description of obstacles to development and implementation of the database system.(3) An estimate of the costs to complete the implementation of the database system.20250HB1130PN1415 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 3. This act shall take effect in six months.20250HB1130PN1415 - 6 - 1